Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1162
Hearing; notice.

Upon the filing of the application as provided in section
54-1161, the director shall fix a reasonable time for the hearing at a place
designated by him or her at which time a hearing shall be held on the proposed
location of the livestock auction market. The director forthwith shall cause
a copy of such application, together with notice of the time and place of
hearing, to be served by mail not less than fifteen days prior to such hearing,
upon the following:

(1) All duly organized statewide livestock associations in
the state who have filed written requests with the department to
receive notice of such hearings and such other livestock associations as in
the opinion of the director would be interested in such application; and

(2) All livestock auction market operators in the state.

The director shall give further notice of such hearing by
publication of the notice thereof once in a daily or weekly newspaper circulated
in the city or village where such hearing is to be held, as in the opinion
of the director will give reasonable public notice of such time and place
of hearing to persons interested therein.

Laws 1963, c. 319, § 6, p. 964;

Laws 2001, LB 197, § 10;

Laws 2013, LB78, § 3.